Massachusetts, session 194th, H3530.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General Court assembled, and by the authority
of the same, as follows:
Section 2 of chapter 164, as appearing in the 2016 Official Edition of the General Laws,
is hereby amended by inserting the following paragraphs: -
All construction, reconstruction, installation, alteration, or repair not performed by gas or
electric public utility employees on public infrastructure shall be performed and procured under
sections 26 through 27F of chapter 149 inclusive and section 39M of chapter 30. The gas and
electric utilities shall request from the department of labor standards prevailing wage rate sheets
for each municipality they are working in once every six months.
The department, under chapter 30A and in consultation with all gas and electric utilities,
shall within one year promulgate rules and regulations for the training and implementation of a
certification program for contractors and their employees repairing or performing work on public
infrastructure in the Commonwealth.
of 1